odt2braille-liblouis/src/main/resources/files/_hyphenation_nl.dic
u4e1ne
u1er
ue3ri
uer3il
ue3s2t
u1eu
u5eul
u3e1z
u3è1
u1fa
u4f3an
u1f2l2
u1f4r4
u4f2s
u5ga
u4gd
ug4da2
ug3de
ug4der
ug2do
ug4dr4
u1ge
u5g4e4l5o
u1gi
u2g3i2j
ug1l4
u2go
ug3or
u2g1r4
u4gs
ug2sc
ug5s1ce
ug3se4
ug4sec
ugs4p
ugs5p4a
ug1s4t
ug1s4tr4
ug4s5tra
u1h
u2i
ui1a
ui5ac
ui2d3a
ui2d1o
ui2d4s1
uid3sp
uidspr4
uid5spre
uids2t4
uid3s1te
uid5s4t4e.
ui1d3u
u4i3e
uie2n4t
u4if
ui2fa
uif3l2
uif5r4
ui2fu
4uig
ui1g4a
ui4g5a4a4
uig1l4
ui2g3o
ui4g3r4
ui4gu
4u4ik
ui2k3a
ui4k3l4
ui2ko
ui2ku
ui2la
uil5a4a4
u4i3le
ui4l3em
ui2l5m
ui1lo
ui4l3og4
ui4lo4o2
uil3o3v2
4uim
ui2m3a
ui3m4ag
ui4n1a
ui2n5g
ui2no
uin5o2g
uin3or
ui2ns
uin3s2l4
uin4s5lo
ui2nt
uin5to
ui2p3l2
ui4p3o4
ui2p3r4
4u4is
ui2s3a
ui4s5c
ui4s3l4
ui5slu
uis5p
ui4s3t
u4it
ui4t3a4
uit5a4a4
uit5al
ui5tar
1ui4t3g2
ui4t1j2
3ui4t3l
ui2t1o
1uit5r4
ui4ts
uit3s2l4
uit3s2n4
uit5sp
uits2t
uit3s4te
uit4s5t4e.
3ui4t3w
3ui4t1z
ui3v2
4u3j
2uk
u1ka
u2k3al
uk3a4s
u4k5k4
uk1ke
ukke4r4s5
u2k3l4
u3k4las
u2k3n4
u2k3o
u3k4oc
uko2p
uk4o3p3l2
u4k3r4
u2ks
uk3s2m
uk3s3p4a
uk3s1p4l2
uks4t
uk4s3ti
uk1w
u1la
u2l3ac
ulam4
ula4p
u4ld
ul4d3a
ul1de
uld5er3k4
ul1do
ul5do4p
ul4d3u
u1le
ule2s
ule5sp
ul3f2l2
ul5fo
ul3fr4
u1li
ul3i4n.
u5li2ng
u3l3in3n
ul3k2a
ul5ke
ul2k3l4
u1lo
ul3o2p
u3l2os
u4lp
ul2pa
ulp3ac
ul4pi
ul2p3l2
ul2po
ul4p3r4
u4ls
ul3sa
ul3so
ul2s3p
ul1s2t
ul3s1te
uls5t4e.
uls5t4el
u3lu
u1ma
um3af
um3ar
u2m1d
3um5da
2u1me
ume4e4
um4es4
ume3s2t
u1mo
u3m3om
u2m3op
u2ms
um3so4
um3s4t
u1mu
u2m3u2i
u1na
u2n3ac
u2n2c
unc2h3r
u4nd
un1dr4
un4dra
un2d4s
unds2t4
und1s5ta
und5s1te
u1ne
une4t
u2n3g
u1ni
1uni1v2
u4n1k
un4k3r4
un4o
uno3g
un5o2p
u2ns
uns4t
un1st3a
un3s1te
un4st4e.
un1st3o
un4s4t5r4
un1stu
unst5u2i
u2nt
un3ta
un4tag
un3te
unte4e2
un4t5ee4n
un2tj2
un4t5o4
un4ts
unt3s4m
un4t3u
u3ol
u3on
u3o4o2
u1or
uo3r1u
u3os
u4o1ta3
4up
u1pa
u1pe
upe3k
upe4r1o
u3pe4rs
uper5s4t
u3p1h4
u3pi
u1p2l2
u4p3le2i
u1po
u3pol
u1p3om
up3op
u1pr4
u4p1t
up4tr4
u1ra
ur2a4a4
u2r3aan
u2r1ac
ur3a1d4a
u4r3a2d1v2
u2r3a4r
uras3
u4r3a2z
u2r1d
ur3d4o
u1r2e
ur3ech
ure4e
u2r3ee2n
uree5s3
ur4e5lu
ure4lu5r
u4rem
ur3e4m1b
ure4n
u3res
ur3e4s3s4
ure3s3t
ur3e1ta
4urf
ur2fa
ur1g
ur3gi
u1ri
ur4ig
uri4gl4
uri2j
ur3ij1z
u4r3i4nd
u4r3i2nt
4urk
ur1ke
urke4n
urke2n5s
ur1ki
ur4k4ie
ur3k4l4
ur2k1s
urk4s5t
u1ro
u4r5o2p1b4
ur3or
ur2o5s
ur1p
ur5pr4
u4rs
ur3se
ur4ser1v2
ur4s3e1v2
ur2s1f
ur3s4fe
ur2s2l4
urs5la4a4
urs5li
ur4s5m
ur2s2n4
ur4sp
urs5p4a
ur3spe
ur5sp4el
ursp4o
ur5spor
ur1s4t
urs4tak
urs5ta1ke
ur4s5th
ur4s3ti
urs5t4ik
u4rt
ur3ta
ur1tr4
ur4tro
ur5tro4e
u3ru
ur3u2i
4ur1v2
u1r4y
4us1a4a4
us3ad
us3a2m
us1a2p
u4sc
u5s2c4r2
u3se
use4t
use5tj2
u1si
u5s4ie
u4sj2
u4s5l4
u4s1m
u2s5n4
uso2
u3s3o6ï
us3os4
u2s3p
us5pi
us5p4u
us2t
us4ta
us5tag
ust3al
u2s3te
us4t3e2i
u4s3ti
u3s4t3o4o2
u1s4tr4
u4s5tr4a.
us5t4r4e.
us5tro
u3s5tru
u1stu4
ust3ur
ust3u4u4
u1ta
uta4a4
ut3aan
utaar5
u2t1ac
ut3af
u3tan
u3ta3s4
u4t5c
u1te
ute4e2
u4t3ee2s3
u4tek
u3t3e2ks
ut4em
u4t5e2m1m
ut2er
ute4r5an
u2t3ex
ut2h
ut3ho
u2tj2
u1to
uto5f
uto4o2
ut3oo4g
uto3pe
utop4l2
uto5po
utop4r4
u3t2o5s4
u4ts
ut3s1a4a4
ut3s2c
ut3se
uts4en
ut4s5e2ng
uts2m
ut1s2n4
ut3sp
ut4sp4a
ut4sp4o
ut2s2t
ut3sta
uts5tak
ut3s1te
ut4st4e.
ut5st4en
ut3s4tr4
ut5su4
u4t3t4
u1tu
u4t5w
u4u4
uu1r3a4
uu1r3e4
uu1r5i
u4ur3k
uu1r1o2
uu4rs
uur1s4t
uur5s1te
uur5s3ti
4uut
uu1t3a
uut3r4
u1v2
uv4e
u5vel
uve4l4s
uve5na
uw1a
u3w4ag
uw4ar
uw5a4rt
u1we
u2w3e2c
u3we5d
uwe4e
uw3ee2n
u2w3e2i
uwe2n
uwe3ne4
uwe4ne2n
uwe2s4
u1wi
u2w4i2j
uw5ij1z
u4wi4nd
u3w4i2ng
u4wi2n2s
uw3i2n1z
uw1o
u3w2o4e
uwo4ge
uw1r
uw3u2
uxa3
u3y1a
4u1z
uz4e
uze3t4
uz2i
uz4ie2
û4t3s4
6ü
ü4b
ü1n
ü3ri
üs3l4
1v2
2v.
va4a4
vaa4rt
vaar4ta
vaar2t5r4
va3de
va3g4
va2ki
v4a4k3l4
va2ko
va2l3a
va2l5m
va3lo
va4lo4e
va4ls
val5si
val4s5p
val1s2t
val3s1te
val4s5tek
va1lu5
va2n
va1na
va2n3ac
va4nd4
va2ng
van1g3a
van4gr4
va3no
va4noc
va1p
va3re
v2a5se
v4a3s4o
va2s2t
v4a1s4t3r4
va3su
va1t
va3te
va2t3h
va2t5j2
va3z
v4b
4v3c
v4e
3v4e.
5ve1b
ve4e
vee4l
vee3l5e
vee3p4
vee2s4
v4e1g
ve3g4h
ve2i
ve4i3s4
v4e4it2
vei5tj2
3vek
5vel
ve1la
ve4l3a4g
ve4ld
vel4d3o
ve3le
vel3k
5vem
v2e1m4a
ve4na
ve5na1re
5ve4nd
ve4n5k
ve2n3o
2ve2n3r
ve2ns
ven4s3e
ven4s2l4
vens5l4an
vens5lo
ven4s2p
vens4t
ven1sta
vensta4a4
vens5taak
vens4tak
vens5ta1ke
ven3s1te
vens5tek
ven4s3u4
ve2r
ver1a
ve1r2a4a4
ver5aas
ve4rad
vera4g
ve4ra4nd
ve2r1d
ver5d4o
ve1re
v4e3rec
ver3e1d
ve3r4e1g
ve3re2i
ver5e4is
ve5r4e4n.
ve5r4e4nd
ver3e4t
ve3ri
veri2j
ver5ijd
ver5ijl
ver5i2js
ve5r4i2ng
ver5k4
ver3o
ve3r3om
1v2er1o5v2
ver5p
ve4rs
ver1sp
ver5spe
ver1s4t
ver5sta
ver5sto
ve4rt
ver5t4w
ve1r1u
ve3ry
ve2s3
ves2t
ves5ti
ve2tj2
ve2to4
vet3og
vet3o4o2
ve3tor
ve2t3r4
ve3t4ro4e
ve4ts
vets2t
vet5s1te
5ve5z
3vi
v4ic
vi3ce
4v5i4ce1pa
vi2d2s1
vid5s2t4
v4ie
vie4r3a
vie4s3
vie2s5n4
vie4tj2
vi3e2u
vi2j
vijf5
v4ik
vi2k4s
vi4l1t
vil4t3j2
vi2ng4
vin4g2s3
v4i3o
vi5om
v4is
vi1sa
vi4s3an
vi1so
vi2s5ot
vis5p
vi4s3t
vi3s5tr4
v4it
vi1tr4
v3j
vje4
vje2t1
3vl
v3lar
vle2i
vle4i3s4
v1li
vl4ie
vlie4s5
vlo4t5s
1v3lo3v2
5v4o.
3vo4e
voe4t3a
voe4t3r4
voe4ts
voet5s3p
3vog
vo1ge4
3v4oi
vo2le
vo2l1g
vol4g3a
vol1gr4
vol4gra
vo2li
vol3i2j
vo4l5p
vo4nd
von3de
von4de3t4
von3d5u
3vo4o2
v4oo5d
vo4oi
voo4i5t
voo2r1n4
voor5na
vo3ra
vor1m
vor1m3a
vo4rs
vor1s4t
vor3s1te
vor4s5t4e.
vor5st4en
v2os3
3vot
vo4t3j2
3vou
v4ous5
3v4r2
vre2i5
vr4ie
vrie4s
vri2j
vri2j5k4
vri2js4
vr4ijs2t
vrij5s3te
v3t
vues4
vu2l
vu4l5p
vu4u4
vuu4r5s
vy3
2w.
wa4a4
w4aad3
w2aar
waa1r5e4
waa4r2s
waar1s4t
waar5s1te
wa4b3
wa3ba
wa5b4l
w2ad
wa3dr4
w4ag
wa2la
wa3l4an
4wam
wa4nd
wan4d5r4
wa2ng
wan4gr4
wan4g2s
wang5s3l4
wa2n1o
w4a2n3s4
3wap
w4ar
w5ar1c
5wa2r1d
wa4r2s
war4s4t
war3s5te
wa4rt
w4ar4t3j2
w4ar4to
wa2si
wa4s5l4
wa4s5p
wa2s2t
w4a1s5tr4
wa1t
1wa1te
wa2t5j2
wa3tr4
3way
2w1b
w1c
2w1d
w1do
w4do4o2
wd3oom
w4e2a
2we2c
3we1d
we1de4
we2d3i
we4d3r4
we4e
wee2k
wee4ki
wee4k3r4
wee2l
we4e3lo
wee2s3
wee3s4t
wee5s1te
3w4e1g
we4g1a
we1ge
we4ger1v2
we2g3l4
we2g3o
we4g5r4
we2i
we4i3s
w4e4it2
wei5tj2
we4k3r4
we4le2
4w3e2lem
w2e3li
w4e2lo
we4l3s
we2m
w2e1m3a
we3me
we2n
we1na4
wen3ad
we3ne4
we4nem
wene2n
we5n4e4n.
wen5e4n5k4
we3ni
we4n1k
wen4k3a
wen3o
we2nt
wen5to
wer2f
4wer1g
wer4ka
wer4k5l4
wer4k2n4
wer4k3o
wer4k3r4
wer3k5ru
wer4k3u4
wer4k3w
wer1p
wer4p3a
wer4p3l2
wer4pr4
we4r4s
wer1s4t
wer5s1te
we2s3
we1sp
we3sp4o
wes2t
wes4t5o
3we4t.
we2th
we2t3j2
we4ts
wet4s2t
we2t3u
2wex
we1z
wez4e
w4e3zen
weze2n4s5
2w1f
w1g
w1h
w4ie
wie4la
wie4t
w4i2j
3w4ijd
wi2jk
wij4ka
wi2j4s
wijs3l4
w4ijs3p
w4ijs2t
wij1s5ta
w4i4k
3wil
wi4nd
win1d3a
win4d3r4
w4i2ng
2wi2n3r
wi2n2s
wins4t
win1sta
winst5a4a4
win1s4t5r4
w4it
wi4t3h
wi4t3j2
wi2t3o4
wit3r4
w1j
2w1k
2w1l
4w1m
2wn
w1na
w2n3ac
w3ne
w3ni
w3no
w3o3b
w2o4e
woes3
woes2t
woes4t5a
wo4l
wo1l3a
wol4f4s5
wo4o2
w4oon
woo2ns
woon5s2f
woo2r1d
woor4d5r4
wor1g
wor4g3e
w1p
wre2ns
wren4s4t
wren3s1te
wrens5t4e.
2ws
ws3a2
w3sc
w1s2l4
w2s3le
w3s2om
w3sp
w2s2p4l2
w4spr4
w5sp2ra
w1s4t
ws3ti
w4sti2j
2wt
w1te
w3tes3
w1tj2
wtje4s3
wtje5sp
w1to
w1tr4
wu2
w1v2
wva2
w1w
xaf4
xa3g
xa1me
xa3men
xame2n5t
xan3
xa2n5t
x1c
x4e
xe4n4d
xe3ro
x1f
x1h
x4ie
xie4t
xi3g
x4i5o
x4is
xi2s3t
xi3s1ta
xi3s1to
x4it
xi4t3i
x3l
x1m
xo3no
x4op
x2o3s4
x1p
xpr4
xpre2
x3pres5
x3r
x3so
x3sp
x1t
x2tak
x3ti
xt4ie2
x3w
xy3
y1a
ya3s4
ya4s5p
y3a1t
y1b
y3ba
yba2l3
y3b4e
ybe4r4t3
y1c
ycho3
y3co
y1d4
y1di
ydi3a
y5dr4
ydro3
y1e
yes3
y3és
y3è1
y1f
y1g
y1gu2
y1h
y1i
y4in
y5is
y2ks
yk4s5g
yks1ge4
y3la
y2l3al
y3le
y4l3et
y3lo
y2lo3l
y2m1f
ym2f5l2
y2m1p
ym5pa
y3na
y1ne
yn3er
y3no
y2n1t
y1o
y3on
y3os
yo3t
y1p
y3p4h4
ypo3
ypot4
y2p3s
yp5si
y1r
y3r4e
y5ri
ys3
y1s4a
y3s4c
y5s4e
yse5t
y3s4f
y3s4h
y1s4i
y3s4o
y3s4p
y2s5p4l2
ys2t
ys4ta
y1s5tr4
y3s4y
y1t
y2t3hu
yto3
y2to2f
ytop4
yu5a
y3u2i
y3u2r
y1v2
yva1ri5
y1w4
1z
4z.
za4a4
zaa4r5t
za3f2
za4gs
zag1s4t
za2k3a2
za2k3r4
za4n2d
z4an1d5a4
zan3di
zan4dr4
za2ng
zan4g3s
za3po
za3s4
4z1b
4zc
4zd
z4e
ze4e
zee3k
zee2l
zee4l5d
zee2r
zee3r4o
zeer1o5v2
zee4r5s
zee3s4
z4e1g
ze5ge
ze4g3s4
zeg4s3l4
ze2i
ze4is
zei3s4p
ze5k
ze4ld
zel5dr4
ze1le
z3e3lem
zel2f1
ze4ls
zel4so
ze4nd
zen4d3a
ze1ni
ze4nin
ze4n5k
zen3o4
zen4og
ze3n1on
ze4r3a
ze3ro
ze4r2s
zer4s5e
ze4s3
ze1sc
ze5s4ch2
ze3s5e
ze3s5l4
zes2t
ze5s1te
ze2t3a
ze2t3h
ze4ti
ze2t3j2
ze2t3r4
ze1v2
zev4e2
zeven3
4zf
4zg
2z3h
z2i
z4ie
zi2ek
zie4k3l4
zie4k3o
ziek3w
zie4l4s
zie5s2l4
3z4if
zi2g5a
zi2j
zi2jk
zij5k4l4
zij3po
zi2j5s4
z4ik
zik2w
zi4n3a4
zi2ng
zin4g2s3
zi4n1k
zin4k3l4
zi2n4s
zins4t
zin1s5ta
zin5s4tr4
z4i3o5
zi1pi3
z4i4t
zi1t3e
zi4t3j2
zi3t3u4
4z3k
4z3l
4zm
zo1di5
zo4e
zoe2t3j2
zoe4ts
zoets2t
zoet5s1te
zo3f2
z4oi4
zo5i1e
zo3la
z4o1me4
zo2na
zo2ns
zon3s2f
zo2nt
zon5ta
zo4o2
zo4oi
zoo4it
zooi5tj2
zo1p
zor1g
zor4g3a
zor4gl4
zor4gr4
zo2t
zo1t3h
z2o3tr4
zo3v2
4z3p
4z3r
2zs
4z5t
zu2i
zui4d3i
zui4dr4
zus3
2z1v2
z4w
zwe4ts
zwet4s2t
zwet4s1te
zwets5t4e.
5zy
2z3z
zz2i
zz3in
zz3or
z4z5w
oo6tje
oo4tj2
aa6t4je
aa2t3j2
ee6tje
uu6tje
uu2tj2
